Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-206
Officers; oath.

The oath to be taken by officers commissioned in such forces shall be substantially in the form prescribed for officers of the National Guard, substituting the words Nebraska State Guard where necessary.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 10, p. 450;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-410;

R.S.1943, § 55-206.